Texas statutes.
INSURANCE CODE

TITLE 8. HEALTH INSURANCE AND OTHER HEALTH COVERAGES

SUBTITLE M. FEDERAL PATIENT PROTECTION AND AFFORDABLE CARE ACT

CHAPTER 1696. COVERAGE FOR ELECTIVE ABORTION; PROHIBITIONS AND REQUIREMENTS

Sec. 1696.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Elective abortion" means an abortion, as defined by Section 245.002, Health and Safety Code, other than an abortion performed due to a medical emergency as defined by Section 171.002, Health and Safety Code.

(2) "Health benefit exchange" means an American Health Benefit Exchange administered by the federal government or created under Section 1311(b) of the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (42 U.S.C. Section 18031(b)).

(3) "Qualified health plan" has the meaning assigned by Section 1301(a) of the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (42 U.S.C. Section 18021(a)).

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 5 (H.B. 214), Sec. 1, eff. December 1, 2017.

Sec. 1696.002. PROHIBITED COVERAGE THROUGH HEALTH BENEFIT EXCHANGE. (a) A qualified health plan offered through a health benefit exchange may not provide coverage for elective abortion.

(b) This section does not prevent a person from purchasing optional or supplemental coverage for elective abortion under a health benefit plan other than a qualified health plan offered through a health benefit exchange.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 5 (H.B. 214), Sec. 1, eff. December 1, 2017.